test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-fiinnas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - fiinâs class A4â: # Noun 'fine/hieno' - full paradigm
#     fiinâs+A+Pred+Sg: fiinâs
     fiinâs+A+Pred+Pl: fijnnâz
     fiinâs+A+Attr: fijnn
     fiinâs+A+Comp: fijnnsab
     fiinâs+A+Superl: fijnnsumus
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Gen: fijnnâz
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Acc: fijnnâz
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Ill: fijnnsa
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Loc: fijnnsest
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Com: fijnnsin
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Ess: fijnnsen
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Par: fijnnsed
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Sg+Abe: [fijnnâztaa, fijnnâztää]
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Nom: fijnnâz
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Gen: fijnnsi
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Acc: fijnnsid
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Ill: fijnnsid
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Loc: fijnnsin
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Com: fijnnsivuiʹm
     fiinâs+A+Attr+Pl+Abe: [fijnnsitaa, fijnnsitää]
